Missouri, session 2026, SB1303.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 137.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 137.016,
to read as follows:
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of
the Missouri Constitution, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property", all real property improved
by a structure which is used or intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants, vacant land in
connection with an airport, land used as a golf course,
manufactured home parks, bed and breakfast inns in which the
owner resides and uses as a primary residence with six or
fewer rooms for rent, and time-share units as defined in
section 407.600, except to the extent such units are
actually rented and subject to sales tax under subdivision
(6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020, but residential
property shall not include other similar facilities used
primarily for transient housing. A single family home
leased for a term of less than thirty consecutive days, in
whole or in part, subject to sales tax under subdivision (6)
of subsection 1 of section 144.020 shall be classified only

SB 1303 2
as residential property. For the purposes of this section,
"transient housing" means all rooms available for rent or
lease for which the receipts from the rent or lease of such
rooms are subject to state sales tax pursuant to subdivision
(6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020; the leasing of a
single family home, in whole or in part, for a term of less
than thirty consecutive days does not, in itself, constitute
"transient housing";
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all
real property used for agricultural purposes and devoted
primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the
feeding, breeding and management of livestock which shall
include breeding, showing, and boarding of horses; to
dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings
and structures customarily associated with farming,
agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to
and qualifying for payments or other compensation under a
soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under
an agreement with an agency of the federal government.
Agricultural and horticultural property shall further
include any reliever airport. Real property classified as
forest croplands shall not be agricultural or horticultural
property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and
shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to
implement Section 7 of Article X of the Missouri
Constitution. Agricultural and horticultural property shall
also include any sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S.
Department of Labor's Standard Industrial Classification
(SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number
2421. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
include urban and community gardens. For the purposes of

SB 1303 3
this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include
real property cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or
community for the purposes of providing agricultural
products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of
residents of the neighborhood or community, and shall not
include a garden intended for individual or personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and
other real property", all real property used directly or
indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial,
manufacturing, trade, professional, business, or similar
purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
state tax commission but shall not include floating docks,
portions of which are separately owned and the remainder of
which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
person or business entity owns more than five individual
units. All other real property not included in the property
listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article
X of the Missouri Constitution, as such property is defined
in this section, shall be deemed to be included in the term
"utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real
property".
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution,
any taxing district may adjust its operating levy to recoup
any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the
surtax imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of
Section 6 of the Constitution, as the result of changing the
classification of structures intended to be used for
residential living by human occupants which contain five or
more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy does not
exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980
tax year. For purposes of this section, loss in revenue
shall include the difference between the revenue that would

SB 1303 4
have been collected on such property under its
classification prior to enactment of this section and the
amount to be collected under its classification under this
section. The county assessor of each county or city not
within a county shall provide information to each taxing
district within its boundaries regarding the difference in
assessed valuation of such property as the result of such
change in classification.
3. All reclassification of property as the result of
changing the classification of structures intended to be
used for residential living by human occupants which contain
five or more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made
after December 31, 1994.
4. Where real property is used or held for use for
more than one purpose and such uses result in different
classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each
classification the percentage of the true value in money of
the property devoted to each use; except that, where
100 agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this
101 section, also contains a dwelling unit or units, the farm
102 dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up
103 to five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling
104 shall be residential property, as defined in this section,
105 provided that the portion of property used or held for use
106 as an urban and community garden shall not be residential
107 property. This subsection shall not apply to any reliever
108 airport.
109 5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held
110 for future use; which is used for a private club, a not-for-
111 profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade,
112 service organization, or similar entity; or for which a
113 determination as to its classification cannot be made under

SB 1303 5
114 the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section,
115 shall be classified according to its immediate most suitable
116 economic use, which use shall be determined after
117 consideration of:
118 (1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
119 (2) Location of such property;
120 (3) Zoning classification of such property; except
121 that, such zoning classification shall not be considered
122 conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is
123 determined that such zoning classification does not reflect
124 the immediate most suitable economic use of the property;
125 (4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such
126 property;
127 (5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers,
128 street lighting, and other public services for such property;
129 (6) Size of such property;
130 (7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares;
131 and
132 (8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of
133 the immediate most suitable economic use of such property.
134 6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not,
135 for taxation purposes, be classified as subclass (1),
136 subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes
137 are prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the Missouri
138 Constitution and defined in this section, but shall be taxed
139 in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
140 of Article X of the Missouri Constitution.
✓